Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1212.02
Records retention and disposition schedule; disposal of records pursuant to schedule; report.

All state agency heads and all local agency heads are hereby authorized to dispose of the records of their agencies in accordance with records retention and disposition schedules which are applicable to their agencies if such schedules have been approved by the administrator pursuant to section 84-1212.01. Each agency head shall report any such records disposition to the administrator on forms provided by the administrator.

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 5.